Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-218.02
Defective corporate actions.

(MBCA 1.46) (a) A defective corporate action shall not be void or voidable if ratified in accordance with section 21-218.03 or validated in accordance with section 21-218.08.

(b) Ratification under section 21-218.03 or validation under section 21-218.08 shall not be deemed to be the exclusive means of ratifying or validating any defective corporate action, and the absence or failure of ratification in accordance with sections 21-218.01 to 21-218.08 shall not, of itself, affect the validity or effectiveness of any corporate action properly ratified under common law or otherwise, nor shall it create a presumption that any such corporate action is or was a defective corporate action or void or voidable.

(c) In the case of an overissue, putative shares shall be valid shares effective as of the date originally issued or purportedly issued upon:

(1) The effectiveness under sections 21-218.01 to 21-218.08 and under sections 21-2,150 to 21-2,160 of an amendment to the articles of incorporation authorizing, designating, or creating such shares; or

(2) The effectiveness of any other corporate action under sections 21-218.01 to 21-218.08 ratifying the authorization, designation, or creation of such shares.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 4.
July 1, 2021